Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-383
Parks, recreational areas, and playgrounds; special levy; improvement district; creation; election.

Without limiting the applicability of sections 14-366 to 14-372, the city council of a city of the metropolitan class is authorized to levy special taxes and assessments on properties benefited by parks, recreational areas, and playgrounds acquired either by purchase or condemnation without regard to whether the benefited property is within or without the corporate limits of the city when an improvement district is created by the city council and approved by a majority of the property owners in the district as provided in this section. Each property owner may cast one vote at an election to be held to determine whether such improvement district shall be created for each fifteen thousand dollars of taxable valuation, or fraction of such valuation, of real property and improvements in the proposed district as determined by the official records of the county assessor for the previous calendar year. When such a district is created by the city council and approved by a majority of the property owners, the special taxes shall be levied proportionately to the taxable valuation of the district. Notice of the election shall be given and the election shall be held in the same manner as other special elections are held in such a city.

Laws 1955, c. 21, § 3, p. 100;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 31;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 36;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 89.
July 21, 2022